Washington statutes.
RCW 43.147.050

Interlibrary sharing—Definition—Member libraries.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, as used in RCW 43.147.040 through 43.147.080 "PNWER-Net" means the technology network to be created by the member states and provinces of the Pacific Northwest economic region that will be capable of electronically linking the following undergraduate university libraries of the member states and provinces:

(1) Alaska:

(a) University of Alaska, Anchorage;

(b) University of Alaska, Juneau;

(2) Alberta:

(a) University of Alberta, Calgary;

(b) University of Alberta, Edmonton;

(3) British Columbia:

(a) University of British Columbia, Vancouver;

(b) University of Victoria, Victoria;

(4) Idaho:

(a) Boise State University, Boise;

(b) University of Idaho, Moscow;

(5) Montana:

(a) Montana State University, Bozeman;

(b) University of Montana, Missoula;

(6) Oregon:

(a) Oregon State University, Corvallis;

(b) University of Oregon, Eugene;

(7) Washington:

(a) University of Washington, Seattle; and

(b) Washington State University, Pullman.

[ 1993 c 485 s 2.]